Utah statutes.
78B-10-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Mediation" means a process in which a mediator facilitates communication and negotiation between parties to assist them in reaching a voluntary agreement regarding their dispute.

(2)  "Mediation communication" means conduct or a statement, whether oral, in a record, verbal, or nonverbal, that occurs during a mediation or is made for purposes of considering, conducting, participating in, initiating, continuing, or reconvening a mediation or retaining a mediator.

(3)  "Mediation party" means a person that participates in a mediation and whose agreement is necessary to resolve the dispute.

(4)  "Mediator" means an individual who is neutral and conducts a mediation.

(5)  "Nonparty participant" means a person, other than a party or mediator, that participates in a mediation.

(6)  "Person" means an individual, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(7)  "Proceeding" means:

(a)  a judicial, administrative, arbitral, or other adjudicative process, including related prehearing and posthearing motions, conferences, and discovery; or

(b)  a legislative hearing or similar process.

(8)  "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(9)  "Sign" means:

(a)  to execute or adopt a tangible symbol with the present intent to authenticate a record; or

(b)  to attach or logically associate an electronic symbol, sound, or process to or with a record with the present intent to authenticate a record.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

